District of Columbia statutes.
21-2115

Construction of power relating to retirement plan transactions.

In a statutory power of attorney the language granting power with respect to retirement plan transactions empowers the agent to:

(1)

Select payment options under any retirement plan in which the principal participates, including plans for self-employed individuals;

(2)

Designate beneficiaries under those plans and change existing designations;

(3)

Make voluntary contributions to those plans;

(4)

Exercise the investment powers available under any self-directed retirement plan;

(5)

Make “rollovers” of plan benefits into other retirement plans;

(6)

If authorized by the plan, borrow from, sell assets to, and purchase assets from the plan; and

(7)

Waive the right of the principal to be a beneficiary of a joint or survivor annuity if the principal is a spouse who is not employed.

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-147, § 2, 45 DCR 3853
1981 Ed., § 21-2115.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 15 of the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act.